Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1305
Provisional environmental health specialist, defined.

Provisional environmental health specialist means a person who is qualified by education but does not have at least two full years of experience in the field of environmental sanitation and is certified in accordance with the Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 526.